Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Organization and lessor employees and volunteers. (a) For purposes of this section, "volunteer" means a person who is not compensated by an organization but who performs activities in the conduct of lawful gambling for that organization. (b) For purposes of this section, "conduct of pull-tabs, tipboards, and paddlewheels" includes selling tickets, redeeming tickets, auditing games, making deposits, spinning the paddlewheel, and conducting inventory. (c) For purposes of this section, "conduct of bingo" includes selling bingo hard cards, bingo paper sheets, or facsimiles of bingo paper sheets; completing bingo occasion records; selecting or announcing bingo numbers; making deposits; and conducting inventory. (d) A volunteer involved in the conduct of tipboards that have no more than 32 chances per game or paddlewheel games conducted without a paddlewheel table may not participate as a player in electronic linked bingo, pull-tab, tipboard, or paddlewheel games at the same premises on the same business day that the volunteer was involved in the conduct of the games. (e) An employee or a volunteer who is involved in the conduct of any lawful gambling during a bingo occasion may not participate directly or indirectly as a player in any lawful gambling during that bingo occasion. (f) An organization or a lessor employee or volunteer who is involved in the conduct of electronic linked bingo, pull-tab games, tipboard games with more than 32 chances per game, or paddlewheel games conducted with a paddlewheel table at a permitted premises may not participate directly or indirectly as a player in electronic linked bingo, pull-tab, tipboard, or paddlewheel games at that premises. This restriction is in effect until two weeks after the employee or volunteer is no longer involved in the conduct of electronic linked bingo, pull-tab games, tipboard games with more than 32 chances per game, or paddlewheel games conducted with a paddlewheel table at that premises. new text begin (g) Notwithstanding paragraph (f), a lessor employee may participate as a player in pull-tab games at that premises provided the employee does not participate during working hours and the employee is off duty. new text end